Hawaii statutes.
§171-112 Acquisition. The board of
land and natural resources is authorized to acquire by lease, exchange, direct
purchase, or eminent domain private property for disposition for agricultural
purposes, including but not limited to agricultural parks. After June 30,
1986, any lands acquired for the foregoing purposes may be designated and set
aside under section 171-11 to the department of agriculture upon its request
for use as an agricultural park. [L 1972, c 110, pt of §2; am L 1974, c 231, pt
of §3(2); am L 1986, c 222, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next